Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 3

Inspection, Control, and Supervision Fee

65-4-301. Fees required.

Every public utility doing business in this state and subject to the control and jurisdiction of the commission to which this chapter applies, shall pay to the state on or before April 1 of each year, a fee for the inspection, control and supervision of the business, service and rates of such public utility.

Fees collected by the commission pursuant to this part shall be expended by the commission for the inspection, control and supervision of the business service and rates of such public utilities as established in subdivision (a)(1). In addition, the Tennessee public utility commission may grant, on a one-time basis, an amount not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) from the public utilities account, as defined in § 65-4-307, to the 2-1-1 collaborative for the purpose of defraying start-up costs associated with the establishment of 2-1-1 telephone service to cover all parts of the state. Such grant may be made only after public notice is provided by the Tennessee public utility commission, specifically giving all public utilities, which are currently doing business in this state and subject to the control and jurisdiction of the commission, the opportunity to raise objection to such grant. The commission shall consider any objection timely filed in response to the commission notice prior to making such grant.

Every owner or operator of a public pay telephone service who is not a public utility paying a fee in accordance with subsection (a), and who is authorized to provide such service pursuant to commission regulation, shall pay an annual inspection and supervision fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each service location. Such fee shall be paid on or before July 1 of each year.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3059a99; Code 1932, § 5459; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-425; Acts 1990, ch. 676, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2004, ch. 762, § 3; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 762, § 1 provided that the title of the act is and may be cited as the “Calling for 2-1-1 Act”.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” and “The commission” for “The authority” throughout; substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” twice in (a)(2); and substituted “commission regulation” for “authority regulation” in the first sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 6; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

65-4-302. Fee in addition to other taxes and fees.

The fee provided for in this part shall be paid by the public utility in addition to any and all property, franchise, license, and other taxes, fees, and charges fixed, assessed, or charged by law against such utility.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3059a100; Code 1932, § 5460; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-426.

65-4-303. Fee measured by gross receipts from intrastate operations — Rates.

The amount of the fee provided for in this section shall be measured by the amount of the gross receipts from intrastate operations of each public utility in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), “gross receipts from intrastate operations”:

Means total revenues, before any deductions, which are recognized by the commission as utility revenue for the purpose of setting intrastate rates under chapter 5 of this title; and

Does not include any revenues from directory operations; provided, that the exclusion of these revenues from directory operations shall not affect the power of the commission to include or exclude these revenues in setting intrastate rates.

For companies that elect market regulation pursuant to § 65-5-109(m), “gross receipts from intrastate operations” means the total revenue derived from the provision of intrastate services to non-affiliated telecommunications carriers, including specifically revenue from interconnection, collocation, billing and collection, inter-carrier compensation, services sold for resale and carrier access; provided, that revenue derived from the provision of retail services and products to consumers that are not telecommunications carriers is excluded.

The fee fixed and assessed against and to be paid by each public utility shall be due and payable on or before April 1, 2014, and each April 1 thereafter, and shall be based on the previous calendar year's gross receipts from intrastate operations. The fee shall be four dollars and twenty-five cents ($4.25) per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of such gross receipts over five thousand dollars ($5,000), except as set forth in subdivision (c)(2) for companies that provide telecommunications services.

Notwithstanding the calculations in subdivision (c)(1), the minimum inspection fee for companies that elect market regulation pursuant to § 65-5-109(m) shall be forty-nine percent (49%) of the inspection fee that was due by such company on April 1, 2012. Such companies shall file with their fee payments a calculation of both the fee as calculated under subdivision (c)(1) and the alternative minimum calculation established in this subdivision (c)(2)(A).

Notwithstanding the calculation in subdivision (c)(1), the maximum inspection fee for a company providing telecommunications services that does not elect to enter market regulation shall be the inspection fee that was due by such company on April 1, 2012.

In no event, however, shall the minimum inspection fee for any telecommunications service company be less than one hundred dollars ($100).

The fee shall be due and payable on or before April 1, 2014, and each April 1 thereafter.

The fee provided for in this section may be recovered by a public utility operating under rate of return regulation through either a rate case proceeding pursuant to § 65-5-103 or a separate recovery mechanism to be determined by the commission. Nothing in this section shall alter the manner in which public utilities that operate under price regulation or market regulation, pursuant to § 65-5-109, may set rates. Nothing in this section shall alter the limitations on the jurisdiction of the commission over market-regulated companies in § 65-5-109. A public utility may recoup its inspection fees by including a line item on its subscribers' bills.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3059a101; Code 1932, § 5461; Acts 1935, ch. 139, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5461; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-427; Acts 1986, ch. 862, § 5; 1987, ch. 53, § 1; 1993, ch. 461, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2009, ch. 531, § 54; 2013, ch. 245, § 4; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” in (b)(1)(A), in (b)(1)(B) and twice in (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-304. Minimum fees.

In no case shall the fee to be paid be less than one hundred dollars ($100), which will be the minimum inspection, control and supervision fee to be paid by any public utility subject to such fee.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3059a102; Code 1932, § 5462; Acts 1935, ch. 139, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5462; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-428; Acts 1993, ch. 461, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 20.

65-4-305. Information required of utility.

Annually, every such public utility doing business in this state shall file with the commission a statement under oath, in such form and substance as may be prescribed by the commission, setting forth accurately the amount of its gross receipts from all sources for the preceding calendar year. Any such public utility failing to file such statement as required, or failing to give such other information as may be reasonably required of such public utility, commits a Class C misdemeanor for each day of such failure to comply.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3059a103; Code 1932, § 5463; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-429; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” twice in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-4-306. Time for payment of fees.

The inspection, control, and supervision fees provided for in this part shall become due and payable on April 1 of each year.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3059a104; Code 1932, § 5464; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-430.

65-4-307. Collection and disposition of fees.

The inspection, control and supervision fees provided for in this part shall be collected by the commission. Such fees, when collected, shall be deposited in the state treasury but shall be kept in a separate account, to be known as the “public utilities account” and the funds so raised shall thus be segregated.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3059a105; Code 1932, § 5465; Acts 1947, ch. 17, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5465; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-431; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” at the end of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

65-4-308. Default.

In case of default in the payment of any fee, or part thereof, when the same shall become due, as provided in § 65-4-306, any such public utility in default shall be liable for a penalty of ten percent (10%) per month or fraction thereof, on the amount of the fee, which may be recovered by suit of the state for every month it remains in default, and any such penalty, when collected, shall be deposited into the state treasury as a part of the utilities account; provided, that out of any such penalty, the commission may employ and pay counsel, who shall have power to institute suit in any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of such penalty, but in no event shall anything more than the penalty be allowed to such counsel for making such collections.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3059a106; Code 1932, § 5466; modified; Acts 1973, ch. 250, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-432; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-309. Lien for fees and penalties.

A lien is declared, and shall exist, upon all the property of each public utility in default, for the payment of the fee prescribed, together with all penalties accruing under this part, which liens shall be superior to all other liens, except those for federal, state, county and municipal taxes.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3059a107; Code 1932, § 5467; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-433.